California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29681.

Such election shall be held on the next established election date not less than 74 days after the board’s approval of the creation of the special service district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1146.)
-------------------------------------------

29682.

The ballot for the election shall contain such instructions as are required by law to be printed thereon and in addition thereto the following: Shall the “San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District, Special Service District No. _____ (here insert number)” be created and established?YESNO

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29683.

No person is entitled to vote at the election unless he is a registered voter residing within the territory proposed to be included in the special service district. The election may be held on the same day as any other state, county or city election and may be consolidated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29684.

The costs of the election required by this article shall be borne by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29685.

The question of the creation of a special service district shall be canvassed separately for each public agency, or portion thereof, in which an election is held, and the board shall order and declare the special service district created in each public agency, or portion thereof, in which an election was held and in which a majority of those who voted upon the proposition of creating the special service district voted in favor of the proposition, and excluding each public agency, or portion thereof, in which an election was held and in which a majority of those who voted upon the proposition of creating the special service district voted against the proposition. A
 certified copy of the resolution declaring the special service district created shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State, and upon such filing the special service district shall be established.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Taxing Subdivision [29690. - 29690.]

29690.

A special service district has no separate corporate existence, but shall be deemed to be a taxing subdivision of the district, and within each special service district the board may levy and collect or cause to be collected taxes for any lawful purpose in accordance with Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 29120) and Section 29183.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Bond Election [29700. - 29705.]

29700.

At any time after the approval by the board of the creation of a special service district, as provided in Section 29674, the board may provide for the submission of a proposition for the incurring of a bonded indebtedness to be incurred by the district on behalf of the special service district to pay the costs of acquiring, constructing or completing the whole or any portion of any transit facilities, or for acquiring any works, lands, structures, rights, equipment, or other property necessary or convenient to carry out the objects, purposes or powers of the district within the boundaries of a special service district created pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29701.

The proposition for incurring a bonded indebtedness under Section 29700 may be submitted to the voters at the same election as the proposition to create the special service district held pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 29680), or at an election subsequent to the creation of the special service district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29702.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the provisions of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 29150) relating to general obligation bonds with the exception of Sections 29150 to 29158, inclusive, shall substantially govern as to all matters pertaining to the manner of calling, giving notice and holding the bond election, the execution, issuance, sale, maturity, redemption, refunding and validation of the bonds authorized by this article, the payment of interest from bond funds, the status of the bonds as investments, the reissuance of bonds, notes, coupons or other evidence of indebtedness which have been lost, destroyed, damaged or mutilated, and past due
 bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29703.

Only those registered voters residing within the boundaries of the special service district shall be entitled to vote on the proposition for the incurring of a bonded indebtedness. The favorable vote of three-fifths of all the voters voting on the proposition to authorize the issuance of bonds at the election held pursuant to Section 29701 within the special service district as finally established is required to authorize the issuance of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29704.

Only the property in the special service district shall be taxable for the payment of the principal and interest on special service district bonds. Until the bonds are paid, taxes shall be levied in substantial compliance with Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 29120) and Section 29183.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29705.

Any proceedings denying the validity of the creation of any special service district, or of any bonds authorized by the voters thereof, pursuant to this part, shall be brought within three months after the date upon which the applicable proposition is approved by the voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Annexation [29710. - 29727.]

29710.

Any territory within the boundaries of the district not included within the boundaries of the special service district to which it is proposed to be annexed, may be annexed thereto in the manner provided in this article; provided that no city shall be divided in the annexation of territory to a special service district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29711.

The board shall by resolution determine that the annexation of the territory will facilitate the acquisition or operation of transit facilities for the special service district, describe the territory, declare its intention to annex the territory to the special service district, set forth the terms and conditions upon which the territory shall be annexed, fix the time and place for hearing on the question of the annexation and provide for notice of the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29712.

Any public agency or portion thereof included as part of the territory proposed to be annexed to a special service district pursuant to this article may, by resolution of its legislative body, or a petition of its voters filed with the secretary of the district prior to the hearing on annexation, require the submission of an annexation proposition to the voters of the public agency, or portion thereof. However, no election shall be held if the board, pursuant to Section 29719, excludes from the territory to be annexed the public agency, or portion thereof, proposed to be annexed in accordance with its resolution or petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29713.

The petition for election provided for in Section 29712 shall be signed by voters within any public agency, or portion thereof, included within the boundaries of the territory proposed to be annexed equal in number to at least 10 percent of the registered voters residing within such public agency, or portion thereof. The petition may include one or more documents, but each document shall contain the affidavit of the party who circulated it certifying that each name affixed thereto is the true signature of the person whose name it purports to be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29714.

The secretary of the district shall compare the signatures with the affidavits of registration on file with the county elections official, and shall certify to the board as to the sufficiency or insufficiency of the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 104.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

29715.

The terms and conditions for the annexation of territory to a special service district may provide, among other matters, for the payment of taxes within the territory to be annexed, in addition to the taxes otherwise provided for in this part, the fixing of rates, rentals, and charges differing from those fixed or existing elsewhere, within the special service district, the making of a payment or payments, or the transfer of property, real and personal, and other assets to the district by the territory proposed to be annexed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29716.

Notice fixing the time and place for hearing on the question of the annexation of territory to a special service district shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation published in the district. The board, in its discretion, may give such additional notice as it deems desirable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29717.

The time of hearing shall be not less than 20 nor more than 60 days from the date of the publication of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29718.

At or before the hearing, any person interested may file with the secretary of the district written objections to the annexation of the territory to the special service district or to the inclusion of his property. Upon the hearing the board shall hear and determine all protests and objections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29719.

The hearing may be continued from time to time by the board without further notice other than an order entered upon the minutes of its meeting fixing the time and place of the continued hearing. In the event that no protests are filed, or the protests filed are overruled and denied, and no election is to be held, the board shall, by resolution, declare the territory, or a portion thereof, annexed to the special service district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29719.5.

If the board finds that protest has been made, prior to the board’s final determination for annexation, by the owners of real property within the area to be annexed the assessed value of which, as shown by the last equalized assessment roll, constitutes more than one-half of the total assessed value of the real property within the area to be annexed, the proceeding shall terminate. The board shall order the proceedings terminated when such protests are received.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29720.

From and after the date of filing of the resolution with the secretary of the district, the annexation of the territory, or portion thereof, to the special service district is complete.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29721.

If an election is required to be held, pursuant to the provisions of Section 29712, the board shall call such election within 60 days after the petition or resolution is filed with the secretary of the district; provided that if a general election is to be held within the petitioning public agency within 120 days after the petition or resolution is filed with the secretary of the district, the board may consolidate the election required by this article with the general election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29722.

The ballot for the election shall contain such instructions as are required by law to be printed thereon and in addition thereto the following: Shall territory in ____ (giving name of public agency or portion thereof) be annexed to San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District, Special Service District No. ___ (here insert number)?YESNO

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29723.

No person is entitled to vote at the election unless he is a voter of the public agency, or portion thereof, requesting the election. The election may be held on the same day as any other state, county or city election and may be consolidated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29724.

The costs of the election required by this article shall be borne by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29725.

The question of the annexation of territory to a special service district shall be canvassed separately for each public agency, or portion thereof, in which an election is held, and the board shall order and declare the territory annexed to the special service district in each public agency, or portion thereof, in which an election is held and in which a majority of those who voted upon the proposition of annexation of territory to the special service district voted in favor of the proposition, and excluding each public agency, or portion thereof, in which an election was held and in which a majority of those who voted upon the proposition of the annexation of territory
 to the special service district voted against the proposition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29726.

Upon the completion of the annexation of any territory, in accordance with law, to any city included in a special service district, the city clerk shall file with the secretary of the district a certified copy of the ordinance, resolution or other document completing said annexation containing a description of the property so annexed. Unless the district within 90 days after such filing shall file with the city clerk the district’s written objections to the annexation to the special service district of said territory, such territory shall, upon the termination of such period, be deemed incorporated into and annexed to the special service district, and thereafter is
 subject to taxation along with the entire territory of the special service district in accordance with the assessable valuation of the property thereof for special service district purposes, and for the payment of any indebtedness theretofore or thereafter incurred by the special service district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29727.

If the district shall file its objections, in the manner provided in Section 29726, to the annexation to a special service district of territory annexed to a city included in a special service district, the territory shall not be annexed to the special service district, except in the manner heretofore provided in this Article 6 (commencing with Section 29710). The district may withdraw such objections by filing with the city clerk a certified copy of a resolution of the board stating that such objections are withdrawn. Thereupon such territory shall be deemed incorporated into and annexed to the special service district, as provided in Section 29726.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Dissolution [29740. - 29740.]

29740.

A special service district may be dissolved by resolution of the board if any proposition for the incurring of a bonded indebtedness fails to carry, and if the special service district is then subject to no other indebtedness or liability pursuant to this part and has been organized for not less than two years. Dissolution of a special service district shall not prevent subsequent proceedings for the creation of a special service district including the same or any part of the area of the special service district dissolved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Dissolution [29750. - 29757.]

29750.

If district bonds for the acquisition or construction of rapid transit facilities have not been voted by the electors within five years of the creation of the district, the board of directors may call an election for the purpose of submitting to the voters of the district the question of whether the district will be dissolved. Upon the filing with the secretary of the district of a petition signed by voters within the district equal in number to at least 25 percent of the total vote cast in the district for all candidates for Governor at the last preceding general election at which a Governor was elected, asking that the question of dissolution of the
 district be submitted to the voters of the district, the board shall call an election for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 393.)
-------------------------------------------

29751.

The election, for the purpose of submitting to the voters of the district the question of whether or not the district shall be dissolved, shall be held within 60 days following the date on which it is ordered by the board or on which the petition is filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

29752.

Notice of any election for dissolution, whether called because of the filing of a petition or ordered by the board without petition, shall be published. The date fixed for the election shall not be less than 30 days from the date of the first publication of the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 182.)
-------------------------------------------

29753.

The ballots for the election shall contain substantially the instructions required to be printed on ballots for use at general state and county elections and in addition the following: Shall the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District be dissolved?YESNO

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 394.)
-------------------------------------------

29754.

No other notice of the election other than that provided for in this article need be given and no sample ballots need be sent to the voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29755.

If upon a canvass of the election it is found that a majority of all votes cast on the proposition at the election were in favor of the dissolution, the dissolution shall be deemed carried and approved by the voters. The board shall meet on Monday next succeeding the election and canvass the votes cast.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29756.

If a majority of the qualified electors voting at said election vote in favor of such dissolution, the board of directors shall, by resolution entered upon its minutes, declare the district dissolved. A certified copy of said resolution shall be filed with the county and city and county recorders and with the Secretary of State and also with the county and city and county assessors and the State Board of Equalization. Upon the adoption of said resolution, said district shall be dissolved. The board of directors, if dissolution is voted, shall wind up the affairs of the district and pay all indebtedness thereof, and any moneys remaining thereafter shall be paid over to the
 counties, city and county and cities, in which the district lies, in proportion to the assessed valuation of taxable property in said city and county and cities and in the unincorporated area of the counties included in the district, as shown by the assessment rolls of the city and county and counties last equalized at the date of such dissolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29757.

In the event that the proposition for dissolution fails to carry, no subsequent election for the dissolution of the district shall be called until after the expiration of one year from the date of the prior election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. SOUTHERN CALIFORNIA RAPID TRANSIT DISTRICT [30000. - 33021.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [30000. - 30007.]

30000.

This part shall be known as the Southern California Rapid Transit District Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30001.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares:

(a) There is an imperative need for a comprehensive mass rapid transit system in the southern California area, and particularly in Los Angeles County. Diminution of congestion on the streets and highways in Los Angeles will facilitate passage of all Californians motoring through the most populous area of this state and will especially benefit domiciliaries of that county who reside both within and without the rapid transit district. It is, further, the declared policy of the state to foster the development of trade and the movement of people in and around the Los
 Angeles area for the benefit of the entire state, and one of the purposes of the Southern California Rapid Transit District is to further this policy.

(b) In view of the limited powers of the Los Angeles Metropolitan Transit Authority (herein sometimes referred to as “authority”) it has become apparent that the authority is unable to solve the transit problems of the southern California area and provide the needed comprehensive mass rapid transit system.

(c) It is, therefore, necessary to provide a successor corporation to the authority, to wit: a transit district, and to establish such transit district governed by representatives of the governmental agencies in the southern California area so that there will be sufficient power and authority to solve the transportation problems in the southern California area and to provide the needed comprehensive mass rapid transit system.

(d) It is evident, therefore, that such a transit district may plan to meet the transit needs and problems of the whole southern California area; and that the estimates of future population growth for the southern California area make it imperative that a comprehensive plan for rapid transit contain projections of population trends extending over the next 30 years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

30002.

The part shall be liberally construed to carry out the objects and purposes and the declared policy of the State of California as in this part set forth.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30003.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the provisions of this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30004.

“District,” as used in this part, means the Southern California Rapid Transit District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30005.

(a) “Rapid transit,” as used in this part, means the transportation of passengers only and their incidental baggage by means other than by chartered bus, sightseeing bus, taxi, or any other motor vehicle not on an individual passenger fare paying basis, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b).

(b) This section does not prohibit the district
 from
 doing any of the following:

(1) Leasing its buses to private certified public carriers.

(2) Providing school bus service for the transportation of pupils between their homes and schools.

(3) Providing charter bus services to governmental agencies, if comparable service is unavailable through privately operated bus companies, and to special events, other than regular and preseason scheduled professional and amateur sporting events.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or paragraph (3) of subdivision (b),
 this section does not prohibit the district from providing charter bus services, which are incidental to the holding of the 2026 FIFA World Cup in the County of
 Los Angeles, to any party or to any event during the period from June 1, 2026, to July 31, 2026, inclusive, if the district complies with all of the requirements set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 30630.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 109, Sec. 3.   (SB 153)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

30006.

“Board of directors,” “board,” or “directors,” as used in this part, means the board of directors of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30007.

“Public agency,” as used in this part, includes the State of California, and any county, city and county, city, district, or other political subdivision or public entity of, or organized under the laws of, this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Creation of District [30100. - 30101.]

30100.

There is hereby created the Southern California Rapid Transit District, comprising that territory hereinafter described in this section lying within the boundaries of the County of Los Angeles and such territory in the County of Los Angeles and in other counties as may be hereafter annexed to the district as provided in this part. The territory within the County of Los Angeles which is hereby created into such district is described as follows:

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

30101.

The district created in accordance with the provisions of this part is a public corporation created for the purposes set forth in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Government of District [30200. - 30336.]



  ARTICLE 1. Board of Directors [30200. - 30227.]

30200.

All powers, privileges and duties vested in or imposed upon the district shall be exercised and performed by and through a board of directors; provided, however, that the exercise of any and all executive, administrative, and ministerial power may be delegated and redelegated by the board of directors to any of the offices and officers created pursuant to this part or created by the board of directors acting pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30201.

The board of directors shall consist of 11 members appointed as follows:

Five by the Board of Supervisors of the County of Los Angeles, who, in the discretion of such board of supervisors, may or may not be members of such board of supervisors, but each of whom shall be a resident of a different supervisorial district.

Two by the Mayor of the City of Los Angeles, subject to confirmation by the City Council of the City of Los Angeles, who may or may not be members of such city council, but each of whom shall be a resident of such city.

Four by
 the city selection committee, each of whom, in the discretion of such committee, may or may not be a member of the city selection committee, but who shall be an elected city official, shall be a resident of a different city, and shall not be a resident of the City of Los Angeles. The city selection committee shall adopt rules and regulations grouping or combining the areas of the cities within the district, except the City of Los Angeles, into four corridors based on existing or proposed transit lines. The rules and regulations shall provide that the member of the board to be selected by a subcommittee of the city selection committee shall be a resident of the corridor represented by the subcommittee. The terms of office of these four members of the board shall be for four years. On and after January 1, 1977, any appointment to the board shall be made by a subcommittee of the committee, which subcommittee shall include only members representing those cities within the corridor that the previous director
 represented. The appointment of a subcommittee shall be deemed approved by the city selection committee unless rejected by a two-thirds vote of the committee within 30 days of the appointment. If the appointment is so rejected, the subcommittee shall make another appointment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 203.)
-------------------------------------------

30201.5.

Notwithstanding Section 30201, if a director appointed by the Mayor of the City of Los Angeles is a member of the city council of that city, confirmation by the city council is not required. If a director appointed by the mayor is not a member of the city council, the person appointed may serve for 60 days without confirmation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 586, Sec. 1.   Effective September 2, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

30202.

At its first regular meeting after the effective date of this part, the Board of Supervisors of the County of Los Angeles shall appoint as members of the first board of directors of the district the number to be appointed by it under Section 30201.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30203.

At its first regular meeting after the effective date of this part, the Mayor of the City of Los Angeles, subject to confirmation by the City Council of the City of Los Angeles, shall appoint as members of the first board of directors of the district the number to be appointed by it under Section 30201.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30204.

Each member of the board of directors appointed by the Board of Supervisors of the County of Los Angeles, shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing body. Each member of the board of directors appointed by the Mayor of the City of Los Angeles, subject to confirmation by the City Council of the City of Los Angeles, may be removed at any time thereafter by following the same procedure used for appointment. If he is a member of the Board of Supervisors of the County of Los Angeles or the City Council of the City of Los Angeles and his term of office as a member of such bodies terminates, a vacancy is automatically created in his office as a member of the board of
 directors. If he is not a member of such bodies his term of office shall terminate at the end of his term as director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30205.

Each director appointed by the Board of Supervisors of the County of Los Angeles shall be appointed by resolution, and each director appointed by the Mayor of the City of Los Angeles, subject to confirmation by the City Council of the City of Los Angeles, shall be confirmed by resolution, and certified copies of the resolutions, together with notices of appointments made thereby, shall be forwarded without delay to the secretary of the district and to the County Clerk of Los Angeles County.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 829, Sec. 54.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

30206.

Any vacancy in the members of the board of directors appointed by the County of Los Angeles or by the City of Los Angeles shall be filled by appointment in the same manner as the appointment was made to the office in which the vacancy exists, in the manner provided in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30207.

A city selection committee shall be established which shall consist of one member representing each city within the district as described in Section 30100, except the City of Los Angeles. Each member of the city selection committee shall serve without compensation from the district and shall be designated and appointed by and be a member of the governing body of the city they represent. As a member of the city selection committee, each member shall be entitled to vote on all motions coming before the committee or subcommittee thereof of which that member is a member, and shall be entitled to cast one vote for each 10,000, or major fractional part thereof, of population in the city represented by the member as shown by the latest population estimate prepared by the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of
 Finance pursuant to Section 2227 of the Revenue and Taxation Code; provided, that each member shall have at least one vote and no city shall have votes exceeding in number the total number of votes of all the other cities represented on the committee. For the purposes of this section, the term “major fractional part” means a fractional part larger than one-half.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 132.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

30208.

On or before the second Monday which is not a holiday following the effective date of this part, the governing body of each city within the district, except the City of Los Angeles, shall appoint from among its members, to serve as members of the city selection committee, the number of members of the city selection committee to be appointed by it under Section 30207.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30209.

Each member of the city selection committee shall serve at the pleasure of the governing body of the city by which he was appointed. If his term of office as a member of such appointing body terminates, a vacancy is automatically created in his office as a member of the city selection committee, and also as a member of the board of directors, if he is so serving.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30210.

Each member of the city selection committee shall be appointed by a resolution adopted by the governing body of the appointing body. Certified copies of all resolutions of appointment, together with notices of appointment made thereby, shall be forwarded without delay to the secretary of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 875.)
-------------------------------------------

30211.

Any vacancy in the city selection committee shall be filled by appointment by the body which originally made the appointment to the office in which the vacancy exists, in the manner provided in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30212.

No person serving as a member of the city selection committee shall be eligible for appointment to any salaried office or employment in the service of the district nor shall he become eligible for such appointment within one (1) year after he has ceased to be a member of the city selection committee; provided, however, that, as provided in this part, members of the city selection committee may serve as directors of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30213.

The county auditor shall furnish the necessary certificates as to assessed valuation to enable the city selection committee to function.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30214.

All meetings of the city selection committee shall be conducted pursuant to the Ralph M. Brown Act, Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30215.

The presence of members of the city selection committee representing more than fifty (50) percent of the total number of votes of all the members of the city selection committee shall constitute a quorum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30216.

The affirmative votes of members representing more than fifty (50) percent of the total number of votes of all the members of the city selection committee shall be necessary and, except as otherwise provided in this part, shall be sufficient to carry any motion coming before the city selection committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30217.

Within ten (10) days after the Secretary of State has received certified copies of the resolutions appointing a majority of the city selection committee, he shall call the first meeting of the city selection committee to be held not less than twenty (20) days thereafter at an appropriate time and place. The meeting shall be held in any city within the district designated by the Secretary of State, and may be adjourned from time to time or to a different place as determined by a majority of the total number of votes of all members present whether there be a quorum or less than a quorum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30218.

The city selection committee shall appoint from its members a chairman and such other officers as may be necessary. Until a chairman is appointed, the Secretary of State, or his deputy, shall act as chairman.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30219.

The city selection committee shall appoint as members the number to be appointed by it under Section 30201 as the first board of directors of the district. All such appointments shall be completed within ten (10) days after the first meeting called by the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30220.

Members of the board of directors who are not members of the Board of Supervisors of the County of Los Angeles or members of the City Council of the City of Los Angeles shall, at the first meeting of the board of directors be assigned by lot so far as possible staggered terms of one, two, three and four years in that order and thereafter the terms of such members of the board of directors shall be four years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 875.)
-------------------------------------------

30221.

Whenever a vacancy occurs in the member of the board appointed by a subcommittee of the city selection committee, the vacancy shall be filled by that subcommittee. The subcommittee shall meet within 30 days following the occurrence to appoint a director to fill the vacancy. The board shall determine promptly the time and place of the meeting of the subcommittee and shall give the members at least 10 days notice thereof. Whenever there shall not be quorum present at the meeting of the subcommittee, the meeting shall be adjourned to a subsequent time and place as determined by a majority of the total number of votes present.

The